src/morphology/stems/closed-classes.lexc
LEXICON Particle
 # ;

LEXICON Subjunction
fordi subj ;
som subj ;
at subj ;
om subj ;
dersom subj ;
enn subj ;
å IM ;
 
LEXICON subj
 +CS: # ;

LEXICON IM
 +IM: # ;

LEXICON Conjunction
og conj ;
eller conj ;
men conj ;
for conj ;

LEXICON conj
 +CC: # ;

LEXICON Interjection
 uff ij ;

LEXICON ij
 +Interj: # ;

LEXICON Pronoun
 Personal ;
 Reflexive ;
 Reciproc ;
 Interrogative ;
 Indefinite ;

LEXICON Personal 
eg+Pron+Nom:eg # ;
du+Pron+Nom:du # ;
han+Pron+Nom:han # ;
ho+Pron+Nom:ho # ;
det+Pron+Nom:det # ;
vi+Pron+Nom:vi # ;
de+Pron+Nom:de # ;
dei+Pron+Nom:dei # ;

eg+Pron+Acc:meg # ;
du+Pron+Acc:deg # ;
han+Pron+Acc:han # ;
ho+Pron+Acc:ho # ;
han+Pron+Acc:honom # ;
ho+Pron+Acc:henne # ;
det+Pron+Acc:det # ;
vi+Pron+Acc:oss # ;
de+Pron+Acc:dykk # ;
dei+Pron+Acc:dei # ;


LEXICON Reflexive
seg+Pron+Refl:seg # ;

LEXICON Reciproc 
kvarandre+Pron+Recipr:kvarandre # ;

LEXICON Interrogative 
kva+Pron+Interr:kva # ;
kven+Pron+Interr:kven # ;

LEXICON Indefinite 
 # ;


LEXICON Determiner
Demonstrative ;
Possessive ;

LEXICON Demonstrative 
det+Det+Dem+Sg+Neu:det # ;
den+Det+Dem+Sg+Msc:den # ;
den+Det+Dem+Sg+Fem:den # ;
eit+Det+Dem+Sg+Neu:eit # ;
eitt+Det+Dem+Sg+Neu:eitt # ;
ein+Det+Dem+Sg+Msc:ein # ;
ei+Det+Dem+Sg+Fem:ei # ;
kvar+Det+Dem+Sg+Msc:kvar # ;
kvar+Det+Dem+Sg+Fem:kvar # ;
kvar+Det+Dem+Sg+Neu:kvart # ;
denne+Det+Dem+Sg+Msc:denne K ;
denne+Det+Dem+Sg+Fem:denne K ;
dette+Det+Dem+Sg+Neu:dette K ;
desse+Det+Dem+Pl:desse K ;
all+Det+Dem+Sg+Msc:all # ;
all+Det+Dem+Sg+Fem:all # ;
all+Det+Dem+Sg+Neu:alt # ;
all+Det+Dem+Pl:alle K ;
slik+Det+Dem+Sg+Msc:slik # ;
slik+Det+Dem+Sg+Fem:slik # ;
slik+Det+Dem+Sg+Neu:slikt # ;
slik+Det+Dem+Pl:slike # ;

LEXICON Possessive 
di+Det+Poss+Sg+Fem:di # ;
din+Det+Poss+Sg+Msc:din # ;
dine+Det+Poss+Pl:dine # ;
ditt+Det+Poss+Sg+Neu:ditt # ;
mi+Det+Poss+Sg+Fem:mi # ;
min+Det+Poss+Sg+Msc:min # ;
mine+Det+Poss+Pl:mine # ;
mitt+Det+Poss+Sg+Neu:mitt # ;
si+Det+Poss+Sg+Fem:si # ;
sin+Det+Poss+Sg+Msc:sin # ;
sine+Det+Poss+Pl:sine # ;
sitt+Det+Poss+Sg+Neu:sitt # ;
vår+Det+Poss+Sg+Fem:vår # ;
vår+Det+Poss+Sg+Msc:vår # ;
våre+Det+Poss+Pl:våre # ;
vårt+Det+Poss+Sg+Neu:vårt # ;

hans+Det+Poss+Msc:hans # ;
hennar+Det+Poss+Fem:hennar # ;
deira+Det+Poss+Pl:deira # ;




LEXICON Numeral 
éin numtag ;
!en numtag ; ! Dem.
to numtag ;
tre numtag ;
fire numtag ;
fem numtag ;
seks numtag ;
sju numtag ;
åtte numtag ;
ni numtag ;

LEXICON numtag
+Num: # ;
